Illinois, session 104th, SB1193.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by changing Section 2PP as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2PP)7    Sec. 2PP. Mail; disclosure. 8    (a) It is an unlawful practice under this Act for a company 9not connected to the company from which the recipient has 10purchased or obtained goods, services, or other merchandise to 11knowingly mail or send or cause to be mailed or sent a postcard 12or letter to a recipient in this State if the postcard or 13letter:14        (1) the postcard or letter contains a request that the 15    recipient contact the sender by mail, telephone, email, 16    website, or other prescribed means; and17        (2) the postcard or letter is mailed or sent to induce 18    the recipient to contact the sender by mail, telephone, 19    email, website, or other prescribed means so that goods, 20    services, or other merchandise, as defined in Section 1, 21    may be offered for sale to the recipient; and22        (3) the postcard or letter does not disclose or 23    disclaim that it is not a bill and that it is a   SB1193- 2 -LRB104 07686 SPS 17730 b1    solicitation for goods, services, or other merchandise, as 2    defined in Section 1, that may be offered for sale if the 3    recipient contacts the sender by mail, telephone, email, 4    website, or any other prescribed means; and5        (4) the postcard or letter does not disclose or 6    disclaim any and all affiliations or lack thereof; and .7        (5) creates the impression that the sender is the same 8    company from which the recipient purchased or obtained 9    goods, services, or other merchandise or is affiliated 10    with that company when no legal or commercial affiliation 11    exists between that company and the sender.12    (b) All disclosures and disclaimers appearing on a 13postcard or letter required by this Section must be 14conspicuously located at the top of the postcard or letter, be 15easily readable in clear and unambiguous language, and be 16printed in at least 14-point bold-face font in a 17black-outlined box. Postcards or letters that are sent in 18compliance with 39 U.S.C. Section 3001 are deemed to be in 19compliance with this Section.20(Source: P.A. 103-87, eff. 1-1-24.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 221, 2026.